Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1707
Felonies; recognizance; conditions; return.

The officer charged with the execution of the warrant aforesaid shall take the recognizance of the party accused in the sum ordered as aforesaid, together with good and sufficient sureties, conditioned for the appearance of the accused at the return of the writ before the court out of which the same issued.

Such officer shall return such recognizance to the court to be recorded and proceeded on as provided in this code.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 432, p. 820;

R.S.1913, § 9076;

C.S.1922, § 10100;

C.S.1929, § 29-1707;

R.S.1943, § 29-1707.